Utah statutes.
72-3-102.   State highways -- Class A state roads.

(1) State highways comprise highways, roads, and streets designated under Chapter 4, Designation of State Highways.

(2)  State highways are class A state roads.

(3)  The state has title to all rights-of-way for all state highways.

(4)  The department has jurisdiction and control over all state highways.

(5)  The department shall construct and maintain each state highway using funds made available for that purpose.



Amended by Chapter 324, 2000 General Session

